Illinois, session 104th, HB2498.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Children and Family Services Act is amended 5by adding Section 34.6a as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 505/34.6a new)7    Sec. 34.6a. Caseload report to General Assembly. The 8Department shall submit to the General Assembly no later than 9March 1 of each year a report in relation to the ongoing case 10files of the Department, the caseload tracking system or 11systems operated by the Department, the ratio of active case 12files to active Department personnel, and how appropriations 13to the Department can be structured to incentivize the 14Department to manage its caseload and to reduce the burden of 15individual case responsibilities upon individual Department 16personnel.